Utah statutes.
57-1-13.   Form of quitclaim deed -- Effect.

Conveyances of land may also be substantially in the following form:

QUITCLAIM DEED

____ (here insert name), grantor, of ____ (insert place of residence), hereby quitclaims to ____ (insert name), grantee, of ____ (here insert place of residence), for the sum of ____ dollars, the following described tract ____ of land in ____ County, Utah, to wit: (here describe the premises).

Witness the hand of said grantor this __________(month\day\year).

A quitclaim deed when executed as required by law shall have the effect of a conveyance of all right, title, interest, and estate of the grantor in and to the premises therein described and all rights, privileges, and appurtenances thereunto belonging, at the date of the conveyance.

